Hawaii statutes.
§144-2 Definitions. When used in this
chapter:

(1) The term "person" includes individual,
partnership, corporation, and association.

(2) The term "distribute" means to offer
for sale, sell, barter, or otherwise supply feed, commercial feeds or custom-mixed
feeds. The term "distributor" means any person who distributes.

(3) The term "sell" or "sale"
includes exchange.

(4) The term "official name" of a feed
ingredient means the name of a feed ingredient which is defined in the current
official publication of the Association of American Feed Control Officials,
Incorporated.

(5) The term "feed" means all edible
materials consumed by animals, other than dogs, cats, or other domestic pets,
which contribute energy or nutrients to the animal's diet, and which are
distributed or imported.

(6) The term "commercial feed" means all
feed except:

(A) Whole seeds unmixed or physically altered
entire unmixed seeds, when not adulterated within the meaning of section 144-6,
which are distributed for use as feed or for mixing in feed.

(B) Hay, straw, stover, silage, cobs, husks,
and hulls (i) when unground or (ii) when unmixed with other materials.

(C) Wet garbage.

(D) Individual chemical compound when not
mixed with other materials.

(E) Unmixed feeding cane molasses, unmixed
pineapple pulp, unmixed pineapple hay, and unmixed sugarcane hay.

(7) The term "feed ingredient" means each
of the constituent materials making up a feed.

(8) The term "mineral feed" means a
substance or mixture of substances designed or intended to supply primarily
mineral elements or inorganic nutrients.

(9) The term "drug" means any article
intended for use in the diagnosis, cure, mitigation, treatment, or prevention
of disease in animals other than human and articles other than feed intended to
affect the structure or any function of the animal body.

(10) The term "manufacture" means to grind,
mix, or blend, or further process a commercial feed for distribution.

(11) The term "custom-mixed feed" means a
special commercial mixture which is formulated by the manufacturer or processor
in accordance with the specific instructions of the final purchaser and
contains feed material or materials wholly or partly supplied by such
manufacturer or processor.

(12) The term "toll-milled feed" means a
special feed which is processed by the processor (A) from materials entirely
delivered by the owner thereof or the owner's authorized agent, and (B) in
accordance with the specific instructions of such owner, and which is not
distributed.

(13) The term "commercial mixed feed" means
a commercial feed which is a mixture or blend of more than one feed ingredient.

(14) The term "commercial simple feed" means
a commercial feed that consists of only one feed ingredient.

(15) The term "brand name" means any word,
name, symbol, or device or any combination thereof identifying the commercial
feed of a distributor and distinguishing it from that of others.

(16) The term "product name" means the name
of the commercial feed which identifies it as to kind, class, or specific use.

(17) The term "label" means a display of
written, printed, or graphic matter upon or affixed to the container in which a
commercial feed is distributed or imported, or on the invoice or delivery slip
with which a commercial feed or custom-mixed feed is distributed or imported.

(18) The term "ton" means a net weight of
two thousand pounds avoirdupois.

(19) The term "per cent" or
"percentage" means percentage by weight.

(20) The term "official sample" means any
sample of feed taken by the department or its agent and designated as
"official" by the department. [L 1959, c 275, pt of §1; am L Sp 1959
2d, c 1, §22; am L 1961, c 132, §2; Supp, §24-3; HRS §144-3; am L 1969, c 27,
§§1, 2; am L 1979, c 186, pt of §1; am and ren L 1983, c 214, pt of §2; gen ch
1985]

Revision Note

Section
"144-6" substituted for "144-7".

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next